Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-754
Loans
subject to act.

Any residential mortgage
loan made with respect to real property located in this state shall be subject
to the Residential
Mortgage Licensing Act and all other applicable laws of this state,
notwithstanding the place of execution, either nominal or real, of such residential mortgage loan.

Laws 1989, LB 272, § 24;

R.S.1943, (2004), § 45-721;

Laws 2009, LB328, § 39.